Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 9-1 to 9-5 designated as Part I by L 1992, c 181,
§2.

§9-1 Definitions. The following terms,
whenever used and referred to in this chapter, shall have the following
respective meanings unless a different meaning clearly appears in context.

"Arts" includes music, dance,
painting, drawing, sculpture, architecture, drama, poetry, prose, crafts,
industrial design, interior design, fashion design, photography, television,
motion picture art, unique or decorative plants, landscaping, and all other
creative activity of imagination and beauty.

"Commission" means the state
foundation on culture and the arts commission established in section 9-2.

"Culture" includes the arts, customs,
traditions, mores, and history of all of the various ethnic groups of Hawaii.

"Executive director" means the
executive director of the state foundation on culture and the arts appointed in
section 9-2.

"Foundation" means the state
foundation on culture and the arts established by section 9-2.

"Grant" means an award of public
funds to a recipient, based on merit and need, to stimulate and support
activities of the recipient for a specified public purpose.

"Humanities" includes fields of study
or learning activities which deal with human thoughts, attitudes, and values,
and encourages the understanding of ideas, values, and experiences which have
or will have formative effects upon our culture.

"Individual" means a natural person.

"Nepotism" means appointing persons
to positions on a basis of their blood or marital relationship to the
appointing authority, rather than on merit or ability.

"Organization" means an association
formed for a common purpose.

"Perquisite" means a privilege
furnished or a service rendered by an organization to an employee, officer,
director, or member of that organization to reduce the individual's personal
expenses.

"Recipient" means any individual or
organization receiving a grant.

"State art museum" means the museum
established pursuant to section 9-22. [L 1965, c 269, §1; am L 1977, c 138, §1;
am L 1980, c 293, §2; am L 1992, c 181, §3; am L 1999, c 80, §2; am L 2004, c
125, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next